California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(b) This section shall not apply to any person who requires or requests a consumer to issue a postdated check if the recipient of the check does not submit the check for collection or cause it to be submitted for collection until on or after its date.

(c) As used in this section:

(1) “Bank” means any person engaged in the business of banking and includes, in addition to a commercial bank, a savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union.

(2) “Check” means a draft, other than a documentary draft, payable on
 demand drawn on a bank, even though it is described by another term, such as “share draft” or “negotiable order of withdrawal.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 914, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.7.

(a) It is unlawful for a seller to advertise any payment, number of payments, or period of repayment for any goods, property, or services purchased through an extension of consumer credit under an open-end credit plan accepted for purchases by more than one seller unless the seller clearly and conspicuously discloses all of the following:

(1) The cash price and the amount or percentage of a downpayment, if any.

(2) The monthly or other periodic payment, the number
 of payments or the period of repayment, the total amount of all payments, and whether the monthly or other periodic payment is calculated on the assumption that the purchaser has no outstanding balance due under the open-end credit plan, if that is the case.

(3) The amount of the finance charge and any periodic rate that may be applied expressed as an annual percentage rate as described under subdivision (e). If the open-end credit plan provides for a variable periodic rate, that fact shall be disclosed.

(4) Any minimum, fixed, transaction, activity, or similar charge and any membership or participation fee that could be imposed.

(5) The name of the creditor, if not the seller.

(6) Whether the advertised terms are available to the purchaser only after
 the creditor’s approval, if that is the case.

(b) (1) A catalog or other multiple-page advertisement that gives information in a table or schedule in sufficient detail to permit determination of the disclosures required by subdivision (a) shall be considered a single advertisement if (A) the table or schedule is clearly and conspicuously set forth, and (B) any statement of the amount of any payment, the number of payments, or the period of repayment appearing anywhere else in the catalog or advertisement clearly refers to the page on which the table or schedule begins.

(2) A catalog or multiple-page advertisement complies with subdivision (a) if the table or schedule includes all appropriate disclosures for a representative scale of amounts up to the level of the more commonly sold higher-priced property or services offered.

(c) It is unlawful for a seller to advertise any payment, number of payments, or period of repayment for particular goods, property, or services purchased through an extension of consumer credit under any open-end credit plan unless the seller clearly and conspicuously discloses the cash price proximate to the advertised payment, number of payments, or period of repayment.

(d) It is unlawful for a seller to advertise terms that actually are not or will not be arranged or offered by the creditor.

(e) (1) For the purposes of this title, the terms “person,” “creditor,” “consumer credit,” “open-end credit,” “cash price,” “downpayment,” “finance charge,” “periodic rate,” and “annual percentage rate” have the same meaning as used in Regulation Z.

(2) The term “Regulation Z” shall mean any rule, regulation, or interpretation promulgated by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System under the Federal Truth in Lending Act, (Public Law 90-321, as amended), and any interpretation or approval issued by an official or employee of the Federal Reserve System duly authorized by the board under the Truth in Lending Act, to issue those interpretations or approvals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 734, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.8.

Any advertisement that offers free or discounted transportation or certificates to obtain transportation and that requires the consumer to purchase accommodations through or from a particular source, or any advertisement that offers free or discounted accommodations or certificates to obtain accommodations and that requires the consumer to purchase transportation through or from a particular source, shall set forth in close proximity to each reference to free or discounted transportation or accommodations, in a size and prominence no less than the largest print
 in the reference, the total price that shall be paid by the consumer for the combination of transportation and accommodations. If the advertisement is oral, the total price shall immediately precede or follow each description of the free or discounted transportation or accommodations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1123, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17538.9.

(a) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Ancillary charges” means all surcharges, taxes, fees, connection charges, maintenance fees, monthly or other periodic fees, per-call access fees, or other assessments or charges of any kind, however denominated, that may be imposed in connection with the use of a card or services, other than the per unit or per minute rate charged.

(2) “Cellular telephone services” means
 facilities-based, commercial mobile telephone services.

(3) “Company” refers to any entity providing prepaid calling services to the public using its own or a resold telecommunications network.

(4) “Distributor” means any person who offers or sells a card or services to a retail vendor or to any other person for ultimate resale to a retail vendor.

(5) “Prepaid calling card” or “card” means any object containing an access number and authorization code that enables a consumer to use prepaid calling services. It does not include any object of that type used for promotional purposes.

(6) “Prepaid calling services” or “services” refers to any prepaid telecommunications service that allows consumers to originate calls through an access number and
 authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed.

(7) “Retail vendor” means any person who sells a card or service to a consumer for use in making telephone calls.

(b) The following standards and requirements for consumer disclosure and services shall apply to the advertising and sale of prepaid calling cards and prepaid calling services:

(1) Any advertisement of the price, rate, or unit value in connection with the sale of prepaid calling cards or services shall clearly and conspicuously disclose all of the following:

(A) Any geographic limitation to the advertised price, rate, or unit value.

(B) All ancillary charges and the conditions under which each applies. This
 disclosure shall be made prominently near the beginning of the advertisement. In a written advertisement this disclosure shall appear in table form in a box with the bold label, “Other Charges.” The amount of each ancillary charge shall be identified in one column and the conditions under which each applies shall be stated on the same line in the column immediately to the right of the charge.

(2) The following information shall be legibly printed on the card:

(A) The name of the company.

(B) A toll-free customer service number.

(C) A toll-free network access number, if required to access service.

(D) The authorization code, if required to access service.

(E) The expiration date or policy, if applicable, except where paragraph (11) applies.

(3) The company shall print legibly on the card or packaging, so that it may be read without having to open any packaging, and the retail vendor shall make available clearly and conspicuously in a prominent area immediately proximate to the point of sale of the prepaid calling card or prepaid calling services the following information, which shall be current at the time of printing and for as long as it is displayed:

(A) The value of the card and all ancillary charges.

(B) Ancillary charges for international calls to each country for which the card may be used or, in lieu of disclosing ancillary charges for each country, the highest ancillary charges for any
 international calls applicable on that card and any additional or different prices, rates, or unit values applicable to international usage of the prepaid calling card or prepaid calling services.

(C) The minimum charge per call, such as a three-minute minimum charge, if any.

(D) The definition of the term “unit,” if applicable.

(E) The billing decrement.

(F) The name of the company.

(G) The recharge policy, if any.

(H) The refund policy, if any.

(I) The expiration policy, if any.

(J) The 24-hour
 customer service toll-free telephone number required in paragraph (9).

(4) Before a customer has recharged a card or service, no company shall provide fewer minutes than those stated, charge more than the rate stated, or charge more for ancillary services than stated on the card or packaging, or in an advertisement available to the public at the time the card or service is purchased.

(5) Service may be recharged by the customer at a rate higher than the rate at initial purchase or last recharge. However, the customer shall be informed of any increased rates or charges prior to the customer agreeing to pay for the recharge.

(6) If a language other than English is used on the card or packaging to provide dialing instructions to place a call or to contact customer service, the information required by paragraph (3) shall
 also be disclosed in that language in the point of sale disclosure in the manner described in paragraph (3).

(7) If a language other than English is used in the advertising or promotion of the card or prepaid calling services or is used on the card or packaging other than for dialing instructions, the information required by paragraph (3) shall also be disclosed in that language on the card or packaging and in the point of sale disclosure in the manner described in paragraph (3).

(8) A company shall provide a voice prompt, immediately after a caller enters a personal identification number and destination number, that states the number of minutes for that call if the entire remaining value of the card or service were consumed in one continuous call to the dialed destination, substantially in the following form:

“You have [insert number]
 minutes if used up in this call.”

(9) A company shall establish and maintain a toll-free customer service telephone number that shall meet the following requirements:

(A) A live operator shall answer incoming calls to the telephone number 24 hours a day, seven days a week.

(B) The telephone number shall have sufficient capacity and staffing to accommodate a reasonably anticipated number of calls without incurring a busy signal or undue wait. The company shall provide customer service in each language used on a prepaid calling card or its packaging and in the advertising or promotion of the prepaid calling card or prepaid calling services.

(C) The telephone number shall allow consumers to lodge complaints and obtain information on all of the
 following:

(i) All rates and ancillary charges.

(ii) The company’s recharge, refund, and expiration policies.

(iii) The balance of use available in the consumer’s account, if applicable.

(D) A company shall not impose any ancillary charge related to obtaining customer service, including any charge related to connecting with the customer service number or waiting to speak to a live operator.

A company offering prepaid cellular telephone services shall be deemed to be in compliance with the requirements of this paragraph if, when a request for information is made outside of normal business hours, that company provides the information requested on the next business day.

(10) A company that issues prepaid calling cards or prepaid calling services shall provide a refund to any purchaser of a prepaid calling card or prepaid calling services if the network services associated with that card or services fail to operate in a commercially reasonable manner. The refund shall be in an amount not less than the value remaining on the card or in the form of a replacement card, and shall be provided to the consumer within 30 days from the date of receipt of notification from the consumer that the card has failed to operate in a commercially reasonable manner.

(11) Cards without a specific expiration date or policy printed on the card, and with a balance of service remaining, shall be considered active for a minimum of one year from the date of purchase, or if recharged, from the date of the last recharge.

(12) In the case of prepaid calling cards or services utilized at a pay telephone, the company may provide voice prompt notification of any ancillary charges related to pay telephone usage, in lieu of providing notice of those ancillary charges as required by paragraph (1) and by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3), provided that the company provides users of prepaid calling cards or services with reasonable time to terminate the call after notification of the ancillary charges related to pay telephone usage without incurring any charge for the call.

(13) A company shall maintain access numbers with sufficient capacity to accommodate a reasonably anticipated number of calls without incurring a busy signal or undue delay.

(14) A company may not impose any ancillary charges that are not disclosed as required by this section or that exceed the amount disclosed by the
 company.

(15) A company may not impose any charges if the consumer is not connected to the number called. For the purpose of this paragraph, the customer shall not be considered connected to the number called if the customer receives a busy signal or the call is unanswered.

(16) The value of the card and the amount of any ancillary charges, that are required to be disclosed by paragraph (3), shall be expressed in the same format. If the value of a card is expressed in minutes, the minutes shall be identified as domestic or international and the identification shall be printed on the same line or next line as the value of the card in minutes.

(17) No person shall offer or sell any prepaid calling card or prepaid calling services that do not contain the information required to be disclosed on the card or packaging as
 provided in paragraph (3).

(18) A distributor that sells directly to a retail vendor shall provide the retail vendor with the current information required by paragraph (3) in a form that may be displayed by the retail vendor as provided in paragraph (3).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.

The Legislature finds that there is a compelling need for more complete disclosure of rules and operation of contests in which money or other valuable consideration may be solicited; that current methods of disclosure are inadequate and create misunderstandings as to the true requirements for participation and winning of prizes offered; that certain problems which have arisen are peculiar to contests; that the provisions of Sections 17539.1 through 17539.3 are necessary to the public welfare and that the terms hereof shall be interpreted so as to provide maximum disclosure to and fair treatment of persons who may or do enter such
 contests.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.1.

(a) The following unfair acts or practices undertaken by, or omissions of, any person in the operation of any contest or sweepstakes are prohibited:

(1) Failing to clearly and conspicuously disclose, at the time of the initial contest solicitation, at the time of each precontest promotional solicitation and each time the payment of money is required to become or to remain a contestant, the total number of contestants anticipated based on prior experience and the percentages of contestants correctly solving each puzzle used in the three most recently completed contests conducted by the person. If the person has not operated or promoted three contests he or she shall disclose for
 each prior contest if any, the information required by this section.

(2) Failing to promptly send to each member of the public upon his or her request, the actual number and percentage of contestants correctly solving each puzzle or game in the contest most recently completed.

(3) Misrepresenting in any manner the odds of winning any prize.

(4) Misrepresenting in any manner, the rules, terms, or conditions of participation in a contest.

(5) Failing to clearly and conspicuously disclose with all contest puzzles and games and with all promotional puzzles and games all of the following:

(A) The maximum number of puzzles or games that may be necessary to complete the contest and determine winners.

(B) The maximum amount of money, including the maximum cost of any postage and handling fees, that a participant may be asked to pay to win each of the contest prizes then offered.

(C) That future puzzles or games, if any, or tie breakers, if any, will be significantly more difficult than the initial puzzle.

(D) The date or dates on or before which the contest will terminate and upon which all prizes will be awarded.

(E) The method of determining prizewinners if a tie remains after the last tie breaker puzzle is completed.

(F) All rules, regulations, terms, and conditions of the contest.

(6) Failing to clearly and conspicuously disclose the exact nature and approximate value of the prizes when offered.

(7) Failing to award and distribute all prizes of the value and type represented.

(8) Representing directly or by implication that the number of participants has been significantly limited, or that any particular person has been selected to win a prize unless such is the fact.

(9) Representing directly or by implication that any particular person has won any money, prize, thing, or other value in a contest unless there has
 been a real contest in which a meaningful percentage, which shall be at least a majority, of the participants in such contests have failed to win a prize, money, thing, or other value.

(10) Representing directly or by implication that any particular person has won any money, prize, thing, or other value without disclosing the exact nature and approximate value thereof.

(11) Using the word “lucky” to describe any number, ticket, coupon, symbol, or other entry, or representing in any other manner directly or by implication that any number, ticket, coupon, symbol, or other entry confers or will confer an advantage upon the recipient that other recipients will not have, that the recipient is more likely to win a prize than are others, or that the number, ticket, coupon, symbol, or
 other entry has some value that other entries do not have.

(12) Using or offering for use any method, including an internet website or an online application, intended to be used by a person interacting with an electronic video monitor, mobile phone, computer terminal, or other similar internet access device, to simulate gambling, which, for purposes of this section, includes, but is not limited to, slot machines; video poker; table games,
 including, but not limited to, blackjack, roulette, craps, and poker; lottery games as defined in Section 319 of the Penal Code; bingo; sports wagering, or any game that mimics or simulates similar gambling and that (A) directly or indirectly implements the predetermination of sweepstakes cash, cash-equivalent prizes, or other prizes of value; (B) otherwise connects a sweepstakes player or participant with sweepstakes cash, cash-equivalent prizes, or other prizes of value; or (C) utilizes a dual-currency system of payment that
 allows a person to play or participate in a simulated gambling program for direct or indirect consideration, including consideration associated with a related product, service, or activity, and for which the person playing the simulated gambling program may become eligible for a prize or award, cash or cash equivalents, or a chance to win a prize or award, or cash or cash equivalents; in a business establishment, on the internet, or using an online application. For the purposes of this paragraph, “business establishment” means a business that has any financial interest in the conduct of the sweepstakes or the sale of the products or services being promoted by the sweepstakes at its physical
 location. This paragraph does not make unlawful game promotions or sweepstakes conducted by for-profit commercial entities on a limited and occasional basis as an advertising and marketing tool that are incidental to substantial bona fide sales of consumer products or services and that are not intended to provide a vehicle for the establishment of ongoing gambling or gaming. This paragraph does not make a game that does not award cash prizes or cash equivalents unlawful.

(13) Failing to obtain the express written or oral consent of individuals before their names are used for a promotional purpose in connection with a mailing to a third person.

(14) Using or distributing simulated checks, currency, or any simulated item of value unless there is clearly and conspicuously printed
 thereon the words: SPECIMEN—NONNEGOTIABLE.

(15) Representing, directly or by implication, orally or in writing, that any tie breaker puzzle may be entered upon the payment of money qualifying the contestant for an extra cash or any other type prize or prizes unless:

(A) It is clearly and conspicuously disclosed that the payments are optional and that contestants are not required to pay money, except for reasonable postage and handling fees, to play for an extra cash or any other type of prize or prizes; and

(B) Contestants are clearly and conspicuously given the opportunity to indicate they wish to enter such phase of the contest for free, except for reasonable postage and handling fees the amount of which shall not exceed
 one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) plus the actual cost of postage and which shall be clearly and conspicuously disclosed at the time of the initial contest solicitation and each time thereafter that the payment of such fees is required. The contestants’ opportunity to indicate they wish to enter for free shall be in immediate conjunction with and in a like manner as the contestants’ opportunity to indicate they wish to play for an extra prize.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Direct consideration” means a coin, token, or other representation of value that may be purchased by a player or received through a bonus or promotion and that is used for playing or participating in a sweepstakes game.

(2) “Indirect consideration” means a coin, token, or other representation of value that may be exchanged for a prize, award, cash, or cash equivalents or a chance to win a prize, award, cash, or cash equivalents. Indirect consideration is provided for free through a promotion, bonus, or with the purchase of a related product, service, or activity. As used in this paragraph, “related product, service, or activity” includes a coin, token, or other representation of value that may be used for direct consideration.

(3) “Sweepstakes” means a procedure, activity, or event, for the distribution, donation, or sale of anything of value by lot, chance, predetermined selection, or random selection that is not unlawful under other provisions of law, including, but not limited to, Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 319) and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 330) of Title 9 of Part 1 of the Penal Code.

(c) This section does not apply to an advertising plan or program that is regulated by, and complies with, the requirements of Section 17537.1.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to render lawful any activity that is unlawful pursuant to other law, including, but not limited to, Section 320, 321, 322, 330, 330a, 330b, 330.1, 337a, or 337j of the Penal Code.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to render unlawful or restrict otherwise lawful games and methods used by a gambling enterprise licensed under the Gambling Control Act or operations of the California State Lottery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (AB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.15.

(a) Solicitation materials containing sweepstakes entry materials or solicitation materials selling information regarding sweepstakes shall not represent, taking into account the context in which the representation is made, including, without limitation, emphasis, print, size, color, location, and presentation of the representation and any qualifying language, that a person is a winner or has already won a prize or any particular prize unless that person has in fact won a prize or any particular prize. If the representation is made on or
 visible through the mailing envelope containing the sweepstakes materials, the context in which the representation is to be considered, including any qualifying language, shall be limited to what appears on, appears from, or is visible through, the mailing envelope.

(b) Solicitation materials containing sweepstakes entry materials or solicitation materials selling information regarding sweepstakes shall include a clear and conspicuous statement of the no-purchase-or-payment-necessary message, in readily understandable terms, in the official rules included in those solicitation materials and, if the official rules do not appear thereon, on the entry-order device included in those solicitation materials. The no-purchase-or-payment-necessary message included in the official rules shall be set out in a separate paragraph in the official rules and be printed in capital letters in contrasting typeface not smaller than the largest typeface used in the
 text of the official rules.

(c) Sweepstakes entries not accompanied by an order for products or services shall not be subjected to any disability or disadvantage in the winner selection process to which an entry accompanied by an order for products or services would not be subject.

(d) Solicitation materials containing sweepstakes entry materials or solicitation materials selling information regarding sweepstakes shall not represent that an entry in the promotional sweepstakes accompanied by an order for products or services will be eligible to receive additional prizes or be more likely to win than an entry not accompanied by an order for products or services or that an entry not accompanied by an order for products or services will have a reduced chance of winning a prize in the promotional sweepstakes.

(e) Solicitation materials containing sweepstakes entry materials or solicitation materials selling information regarding sweepstakes shall not represent that a person has been specially selected in connection with a sweepstakes unless it is true.

(f) Solicitation materials containing sweepstakes entry materials or solicitation materials selling information regarding sweepstakes shall not represent that the person receiving the solicitation has received any special treatment or personal attention from the sweepstakes sponsor or any officer, employee, or agent of the sweepstakes sponsor unless the representation of special treatment or personal attention is true.

(g) Solicitation materials containing sweepstakes entry materials or solicitation materials selling information regarding sweepstakes shall not represent that a person is being notified a second or final time
 of the opportunity to receive or compete for a prize, unless that representation is true.

(h) Solicitation materials containing sweepstakes entry materials or solicitation materials selling information regarding sweepstakes shall not represent that a prize notice is urgent or otherwise convey an impression of urgency by use of description, phrasing on a mailing envelope, or similar method, unless there is a limited time period in which the recipient must take some action to claim, or be eligible to receive, a prize, and the date by which that action is required is clearly and conspicuously disclosed in the body of the solicitation materials.

(i) Solicitation materials containing sweepstakes entry materials or solicitation materials selling information regarding sweepstakes shall not do either of the following:

(1) Simulate or falsely represent that it is a document authorized, issued, or approved by any court, official, or agency of the United States or any state, or by any lawyer, law firm, or insurance or brokerage company.

(2) Create a false impression as to its source, authorization, or approval.

(j) The official rules for a sweepstakes shall disclose information about the date or dates the final winner or winners will be determined.

(k) For purposes of this section:

(1) “No-purchase-or-payment-necessary message” means the following statement or a statement substantially similar to the following statement: “No purchase or payment of any kind is necessary to enter or win this sweepstakes.”

(2) “Official rules” means the formal printed statement, however designated, of the rules for the promotional sweepstakes appearing in the solicitation materials. The official rules shall be prominently identified and all references thereto in any solicitation materials shall consistently use the designation for the official rules that appears in those materials. Each sweepstakes solicitation shall contain a copy of the official rules.

(3) “Specially selected” means a representation that a person is a winner, a finalist, in first place or tied for first place, or otherwise among a limited group of persons with an enhanced likelihood of receiving a prize.

(l) (1) A sweepstakes sponsor may not charge a fee as a condition of receiving a monetary distribution or obtaining information about a prize or sweepstakes.

(2) (A) For the purposes of this section, “sweepstakes sponsor” means either of the following:

(i) A person or entity that operates or administers a sweepstakes as defined in paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) of Section 17539.5.

(ii) A person or entity that offers, by means of a notice, a prize to another person in conjunction with any real or purported sweepstakes that requires or allows, or creates the impression of requiring or allowing, the person to purchase any goods or services, or pay any money, as a condition of receiving, or in conjunction with allowing the person to receive, use, or obtain a prize or information about a prize.

(B) A person or entity that merely furnishes a prize in connection with a sweepstakes that is
 operated or administered by another person or entity shall not be deemed to be a sweepstakes sponsor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 749, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.2.

Every person who conducts any contest shall:

(a) Clearly and conspicuously disclose on each entry blank the deadline for submission of that entry.

(b) Refund all money or other consideration to contestants requesting such refund in writing within one year of payment and who are unable to participate in any aspect of any contest through no fault of the contestant.

(c) At the conclusion of the contest send to all entrants upon their request
 the names of all winners, the prize or prizes won by each, the correct solution to each puzzle and the winning solutions to each puzzle (if different from the correct solution).

(d) Maintain for no less than two years after all prizes are awarded all the following:

(1) Copies of all contest solicitations and puzzles.

(2) All puzzles and correspondence sent by a contestant or copies or records disclosing details thereof and records of replies thereto.

(3) Adequate records which disclose the names and addresses of all contestants, the approximate date each contestant was sent each puzzle or game, the number of prizes awarded, the method of selecting winners, the names and addresses of the winners, and facts upon which all representations or disclosures
 made in connection with the contest are based and from which the validity of the representations or disclosures can be determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.3.

(a) Sections 17539.1 and 17539.2 do not apply to a game conducted to promote the sale of an employer’s product or service by his or her employees, when those employees are the sole eligible participants.

(b) As used in Sections 17539.1 and 17539.2, “person” includes a firm, corporation, or association, but does not include any charitable trust, corporation, or other organization exempted from taxation under Section 23701d of the Revenue and Taxation Code or Section 501(c) of
 the Internal Revenue Code.

(c) Nothing in Sections 17539 to 17539.2, inclusive, shall be construed to permit any contest or any series of contests or any act or omission in connection therewith that is prohibited by any other provision of law.

(d) Nothing in Section 17539.1 or 17539.2 shall be construed to hold any newspaper publisher or radio or television broadcaster liable for publishing or broadcasting any advertisement relating to a contest, unless that publisher or broadcaster is the person conducting or holding that contest.

(e) As used in Sections 17539 to 17539.2, inclusive, “contest” includes any game, contest, puzzle, scheme, or plan that holds out or offers to prospective participants the opportunity to receive or compete for gifts, prizes, or gratuities as determined by skill or any combination of chance
 and skill and that is, or in whole or in part may be, conditioned upon the payment of consideration.

(f) Sections 17539 to 17539.2, inclusive, do not apply to the mailing or otherwise sending of an application for admission, or a notification or token evidencing the right of admission, to a contest, performance, sporting event, or tournament of skill, speed, power, or endurance between, or the operation of the contest, performance, sporting event, or tournament by, participants physically present at that contest, performance, sporting event, or tournament.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.35.

No person shall advertise, offer, or operate any contest, as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 17539.3, in which any prize, including any money, property, service, or other matter of value, may be awarded or transferred if the opportunity to win that prize is conditioned on a minimum number of entries or contest participants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1074, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.4.

No person shall place an advertisement disseminated primarily in this state for a loan which utilizes real property as collateral unless there is disclosed within the printed text of that advertisement, or the oral text in the case of a radio or television advertisement, the license under which the loan would be made or arranged, the state regulatory entity supervising that type of loan transaction or, in the case of unlicensed lending activity, a statement that the loan is being made or arranged by an unlicensed party who is not operating under the regulatory
 supervision of a state agency.

This section shall not apply to any bank or bank holding company, or to any savings association or federal association as defined by Section 5102 of the Financial Code, or to any industrial loan company or credit union, or to any subsidiary or affiliate of these entities if the subsidiary or affiliate is not separately licensed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 864, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17539.5.

(a) For purposes of this section and Sections 17539.55 and 17539.6:

(1) “Broadcast” means the utilization of radio, television, home videos, movie screens, telephones, or other medium, including the Internet, that does not automatically provide the prospective consumer with a printed or written document he or she can read at leisure.

(2) “Caller” means a telephone user or end user who calls or may call an
 information-access service or who receives a telephonic solicitation that results in the recipient being connected to an information-access service.

(3) “Carrier” means any regional telephone operating company, interexchange carrier, or local exchange telephone company that provides telecommunications transmission services.

(4) “Incentive” means any item or service of value, however denominated, including, but not limited to, any prize, award, gift, or money, or any coupon that can be used in whole or in part to obtain a product or service.

(5) “Information provider” means a person who advertises or sells an information-access service and on whose behalf charges are billed.

(6) “Information-access service” means any telecommunications service that
 permits individuals to access a telephone number, and for which the caller is assessed, by virtue of placing or completing the call, a charge that is greater than, or in addition to, the charge for the transmission of the call. Information-access service includes, but is not limited to, telephone numbers with the prefix 900 or 976.

(7) “900 number” means any prefixed telephone number used for information-access service and includes, but is not limited to, telephone numbers with the prefix 900 or 976.

(8) “Prize” means any item of value given to winners in a sweepstakes who have been selected on the basis of lot or chance.

(9) “Program” means the audio message that the caller hears or receives upon placing or receiving a call and being connected to an information-access service.

(10) “Sell an information service” means to attempt to cause a caller to act in a manner that causes that caller to be charged for utilizing an information-access service.

(11) “Solicitation” includes all forms of solicitation for information-access services, including, but not limited to, mailings, advertisements in newspapers and magazines, advertisements broadcast by radio or television, advertisements contained in home videos or appearing on movie screens, telephone solicitations, and advertisements transmitted over the Internet. “Solicitation” does not include simple listings in telephone directories provided those listings are not accompanied by any advertising text.

(12) “Sweepstakes” means any procedure for the distribution of anything of value by lot or by chance that is not unlawful under other provisions of
 law including, but not limited to, the provisions of Section 320 of the Penal Code. Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to render lawful any activity that otherwise would violate Section 320 of the Penal Code.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to engage in any of the following acts in order to encourage any caller to utilize an information-access service:

(1) Soliciting callers by use of an automatic dialing device or a live or recorded outbound telephone message.

(2) Utilizing signals or tones provided directly or indirectly by the information provider to access the information-access service.

(3) Requiring callers to call more than one 900 number or to require calling the same 900 number more than one time in order to receive goods or
 services represented in the initial solicitation.
